Indiana, session 2026, SB204.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-28-5-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2013,
SECTION 253, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The department shall
establish a program under which an individual may obtain a license
that allows the individual to teach in a charter school if the individual:
(1) wishes to teach in a charter school in Indiana; and
(2) satisfies either of the following requirements:
(A) The individual holds at least a bachelor's degree with a
grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 point scale from an
accredited postsecondary institution in the content or a related
area in which the individual wishes to teach.
(B) The individual holds at least a bachelor's degree and proof
that the individual has passed the state approved content area
examination in the subject area that the individual intends to
teach.
(b) The program established under subsection (a) must allow the
individual to teach in a charter school while the individual is in the
process of obtaining the license.
(c) Subject to subsection (d), if an individual described in
subsection (a) demonstrates effectiveness as a teacher, as
determined by the applicable charter school leader, for not less
than two (2) consecutive years, the individual shall be eligible to
SEA 204 — CC 1

2
obtain an initial practitioner professional educator license for the
content area in which the individual has taught.
(d) An individual eligible to obtain an initial practitioner
professional educator license under subsection (c) must:
(1) demonstrate proficiency through a written examination,
as described in section 12(b)(2) of this chapter, in the
knowledge area in which the individual has taught and is
seeking an initial practitioner professional educator license;
and
(2) complete the training described in section 12.3 of this
chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 20-28-5-16.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.194-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16.5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c),
the department shall grant an initial practitioner license to an individual
who meets the following requirements:
(1) The individual holds a bachelor's degree with a grade point
average of at least 2.5 on a 4.0 scale from an accredited
postsecondary educational institution. with a major in any
combination of the following:
(A) Science.
(B) Technology.
(C) Engineering.
(D) Mathematics.
(2) The individual successfully completes a total of at least nine
(9) academic credits in courses that include instruction on the
following:
(A) High impact practices in:
(i) lesson planning;
(ii) instructional design;
(iii) instructional activities;
(iv) integrating learning modalities; and
(v) if applicable, developing laboratory experiments.
(B) The use of:
(i) digital media;
(ii) learning management software; and
(iii) technology to maximize learning.
(C) Teaching:
(i) inductive and deductive reasoning;
(ii) metacognition;
(iii) problem framing;
(iv) interpreting results; and
SEA 204 — CC 1

3
(v) data based decision making.
(D) Best practices to evaluate student learning through:
(i) diagnostic assessment;
(ii) direct and indirect assessment; and
(iii) formative and summative assessment.
(E) Creating feedback loops.
(F) Fostering engagement and using peer to peer learning and
other small group strategies.
(G) Providing constructive feedback and preventing disruptive
behavior.
(H) Early intervention strategies and professional standards.
(I) Teaching students with disabilities.
(3) The individual demonstrates proficiency through a written
examination in the knowledge of the areas in which the individual
is required to have a license to teach, as described in section
12(b)(2) of this chapter.
(4) The individual has completed the training described in section
12.3 of this chapter.
(5) The individual participates in one (1) or more of the following,
as determined by the department:
(A) Job shadowing.
(B) Field experiences.
(C) Teaching cooperatives.
(D) Full-term student teaching.
(b) An individual who receives an initial practitioner license under
this section:
(1) may only teach in any combination of grades 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10,
11, or 12, as determined by the department;
(2) shall be treated in the same manner as an individual who
receives an initial practitioner license after completing a
traditional teacher preparation program; and
(3) must be treated in the same manner as a traditional teacher
preparation program graduate during the transition from an initial
practitioner license to a practitioner license.
(c) The department may not grant an initial practitioner license
under this section to teach special education.
(c) (d) The state board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
administer this section.
SECTION 3. IC 20-28-9-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 123, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1.5. (a) This subsection governs
salary increases for a teacher employed by a school corporation.
SEA 204 — CC 1

4
Compensation attributable to additional degrees or graduate credits
earned before the effective date of a local compensation plan created
under this chapter before July 1, 2015, shall continue for school years
beginning after June 30, 2015. Compensation attributable to additional
degrees for which a teacher has started course work before July 1,
2011, and completed course work before September 2, 2014, shall also
continue for school years beginning after June 30, 2015. For school
years beginning after June 30, 2022, a school corporation may provide
a supplemental payment to a teacher in excess of the salary specified
in the school corporation's compensation plan when doing so is in the
best interest of students. A supplement provided under this subsection
is not subject to collective bargaining and, under IC 20-29-6-3(d), a
school corporation may exclude, for this purpose, a portion of the
revenue available for bargaining from education fund revenues
included in IC 20-29-2-6. Such a supplement is in addition to any
increase permitted under subsection (b).
(b) Subject to subsection (e), increases or increments in a local
salary range must be based upon a combination of the following
factors:
(1) A combination of the following factors taken together may
account for not more than fifty percent (50%) of the calculation
used to determine a teacher's increase or increment:
(A) The number of years of a teacher's experience.
(B) The possession of either:
(i) additional content area degrees beyond the requirements
for employment; or
(ii) additional content area degrees and credit hours beyond
the requirements for employment, if required under an
agreement bargained under IC 20-29.
(2) The results of an evaluation conducted under IC 20-28-11.5.
(3) The assignment of instructional leadership roles, including the
responsibility for conducting evaluations under IC 20-28-11.5.
(4) The academic needs of students in the school corporation,
including employment in a high need area such as those identified
under IC 20-29-3-15(b)(27). This factor may not:
(A) account for less than ten percent (10%) of the calculation
used to determine a teacher's increase or increment;
(B) apply to all eligible teachers in a bargaining unit
uniformly; or
(C) be based on any factor described in subdivisions (1)
through (3).
(c) To provide greater flexibility and options, a school corporation
SEA 204 — CC 1

5
may further differentiate the amount of salary increases or increments
determined for teachers. A school corporation shall base a
differentiated amount under this subsection on reasons the school
corporation determines are appropriate, which may include the:
(1) subject or subjects taught by a given teacher;
(2) importance of retaining a given teacher at the school
corporation;
(3) need to attract an individual with specific qualifications to fill
a teaching vacancy; and
(4) offering of a new program or class.
(d) A school corporation may provide differentiated increases or
increments under subsection (b), and in excess of the percentage
specified in subsection (b)(1), in order to:
(1) reduce the gap between the school corporation's minimum
teacher salary and the average of the school corporation's
minimum and maximum teacher salaries; or
(2) allow teachers currently employed by the school corporation
to receive a salary adjusted in comparison to starting base salaries
of new teachers.
(e) A school corporation shall differentiate the amount of salary
increases or increments for teachers who possess a required literacy
endorsement under IC 20-28-5-19.7.
(f) The Indiana education employment relations board established
in IC 20-29-3-1 shall publish a model compensation plan with a model
salary range that a school corporation may adopt.
(g) Each school corporation shall submit its local compensation plan
to the Indiana education employment relations board. A local
compensation plan must specify the range for teacher salaries. The
Indiana education employment relations board shall publish the local
compensation plans on the Indiana education employment relations
board's website.
(h) The Indiana education employment relations board shall review
a compensation plan for compliance with this section as part of its
review under IC 20-29-6-6.1. The Indiana education employment
relations board has jurisdiction to determine compliance of a
compensation plan submitted under this section.
(i) This chapter may not be construed to require or allow a school
corporation to decrease the salary of any teacher below the salary the
teacher was earning on or before July 1, 2015, if that decrease would
be made solely to conform to the new compensation plan.
(j) After June 30, 2011, all rights, duties, or obligations established
under IC 20-28-9-1 before its repeal are considered rights, duties, or
SEA 204 — CC 1

6
obligations under this section.
(k) An employment agreement described in IC 20-28-6-7.3 between
an adjunct teacher and a school corporation is not subject to this
section.
SECTION 4. IC 21-15-2-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 4. (a) Each state educational institution shall submit a
report annually to the legislative council and the commission for higher
education that includes the amount of need based financial aid and
merit based financial aid available to students from all sources.
(b) A report submitted to the legislative council under this section
must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 5. IC 21-18-6-9.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 246, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) As used in this section,
"physical facilities" refers to space assigned to departments and
organizational units of a state educational institution, including space
assigned to departments and organizational units that have functions
related to instruction, research, public service, academic support,
student services, institutional support, operation and maintenance of
physical facilities, auxiliary enterprises, independent operations or
noninstitutional activities, hospitals, and residential activities.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2026, and not later than each July 1
thereafter, the commission shall prepare and submit to the legislative
council and to the budget committee a report that examines the
utilization of physical facilities primarily used for instruction at each
state educational institution. The report must include at least the:
(1) number of classroom instructional spaces, instructional
laboratory spaces, and combined classroom and instructional
laboratory spaces in each physical facility; and
(2) utilization of classroom instructional spaces, instructional
laboratory spaces, and combined classroom and instructional
laboratory spaces in each physical facility;
as defined by the commission.
(c) In compiling the information for the report required by this
section, the commission shall consider:
(1) characteristics of the student body of a state educational
institution, such as serving part-time students, commuter students,
and working adults;
(2) the types of programs provided, and associated necessary
instructional space, by a state educational institution; and
(3) information about physical facilities that is collected by the
commission in support of the commission's recommendations
SEA 204 — CC 1

7
concerning capital as described in IC 21-18-9-1.
(d) A state educational institution shall provide any information
required by the commission that is necessary to complete the report
required by this section in the form and manner required by the
commission.
(e) A report submitted to the legislative council under this section
must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(f) This section expires June 30, 2029.
SECTION 6. IC 21-18-9-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 9. (a) In collaboration with each state educational
institution's institutional research or strategic planning department, the
commission shall develop an annual report to the general assembly that
includes the following information:
(1) Faculty activities related to the mission of the state
educational institution, including teaching, course grading
practices, research, scholarship, outreach, and professional
services.
(2) Average and median faculty and administrator salaries.
(3) Median grade point averages for all students for the fall and
spring semesters.
(4) Median grade point averages for all graduating seniors.
(5) Other information the commission considers necessary.
The information in the report must include undergraduate student
information and faculty data by academic department, college, or
university.
(b) A state educational institution shall provide the information set
forth in subsection (a) in the form required by the commission.
(c) The report to the general assembly under subsection (a) must be
in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 7. IC 21-18-9-10.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 248, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10.7. (a) For each state educational
institution degree program, if the:
(1) average number of students who graduate over the
immediately preceding three (3) years is fewer than:
(A) ten (10) students for a particular associate degree program;
(B) fifteen (15) students for a particular bachelor's degree
program;
(C) seven (7) students for a particular master's degree
program;
(D) three (3) students for a particular education specialist
program; or
SEA 204 — CC 1

8
(E) three (3) students for a particular doctorate degree
program; and
(2) state educational institution would like to continue a degree
program described in subdivision (1);
the state educational institution must request approval from the
commission to continue the degree program.
(b) Subject to subsection (c), if the commission does not grant
approval under subsection (a), the state educational institution must
eliminate:
(1) the degree program; and
(2) any costs associated with the degree program.
(c) A state educational institution that has been denied approval
under subsection (a) may:
(1) permit students to enroll in the degree program until June
1 of the year following the commission's denial; and
(2) provide students enrolled in the degree program with the
opportunity to finish their degree prior to the degree
program's closure under subsection (b).
(d) The commission shall prepare an annual report concerning
the number of degree programs that were denied approval under
subsection (a). The report described in this subsection must be
submitted, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, to the general
assembly not later than December 1 of each year.
SECTION 8. IC 21-18-9-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 11. (a) The commission shall do the following:
(1) Annually determine for each state educational institution:
(A) the percentage of students enrolled in the state educational
institution who are charged tuition based on the resident
tuition rate; and
(B) the percentage of students enrolled in the state educational
institution who are charged tuition based on the nonresident
tuition rate.
(2) Report the information determined for each state educational
institution under subdivision (1) to the budget committee and the
legislative council before December 1 of each year. The report to
the legislative council must be in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
(b) A state educational institution must submit to the commission
any information needed by the commission to determine the
percentages under subsection (a).
SECTION 9. IC 21-18-13 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Student Athletes: Sudden Cardiac Arrest).
SEA 204 — CC 1

9
SECTION 10. IC 21-30-7-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.142-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A state educational institution shall
disclose to the commission any gift of any value received directly or
indirectly from any foreign source located in a foreign adversary as
follows:
(1) For a disclosable gift received after December 31, 2020, and
before July 1, 2024, not later than September 1, 2024.
(2) For a disclosable gift received after June 30, 2024, biannually
on January 1 January 31 and July 1 July 31 of each subsequent
year.
(b) A gift received from a foreign source through an intermediary or
affiliate organization is considered an indirect gift to a state educational
institution and is subject to the disclosure required by subsection (a).
SECTION 11. IC 21-33-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2014,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Subject to this section, in addition to
projects authorized by the general assembly, the board of trustees of a
state educational institution may engage in a project to:
(1) construct buildings or facilities of a cost greater than two
three million dollars ($2,000,000); ($3,000,000); or
(2) purchase or lease-purchase land, buildings, or facilities the
principal value of which exceeds two three million dollars
($2,000,000); ($3,000,000);
only if there are funds available for the project, the project meets any
of the applicable conditions, and the project is reviewed by the
commission for higher education and approved by the governor upon
recommendation of the budget agency. The review by the commission
for higher education must be completed not later than ninety (90) days
after the project is submitted for review.
(b) If:
(1) any part of the cost of a project described in subsection (a) is
paid by state appropriated funds or by mandatory student fees
assessed all students for the project; and
(2) the project is to:
(A) construct new buildings or facilities of a cost greater than
two three million dollars ($2,000,000); ($3,000,000); or
(B) purchase or lease-purchase land, buildings, or facilities the
principal value of which exceeds two three million dollars
($2,000,000); ($3,000,000);
the project must also be approved by the general assembly.
(c) This section does not limit the board of trustees in
SEA 204 — CC 1

10
supplementing a project approved by the general assembly from gifts
or other available funds so long as approval for the expansion of the
project is given by the governor on review by the commission for
higher education and recommendation of the budget agency.
(d) The review and approval requirements of this section do not
apply to a project to:
(1) construct buildings or facilities; or
(2) purchase or lease-purchase land, buildings, or facilities;
if the project involves the expansion or improvement of housing for
students undertaken entirely by a fraternity or sorority at the state
educational institution.
SECTION 12. IC 21-33-3-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2014,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Subject to subsection (b), in addition to
projects authorized by the general assembly, the board of trustees of a
state educational institution may engage in a repair and rehabilitation
project for which:
(1) the cost of the project exceeds two three million dollars
($2,000,000); ($3,000,000); and
(2) any part of the cost of the project is paid by state appropriated
funds or by mandatory student fees assessed all students for the
project;
only if the project is reviewed by the commission for higher education
and approved by the governor, on recommendation of the budget
agency. The review by the commission for higher education must be
completed not later than ninety (90) days after the project is submitted
for review.
(b) If no part of the cost of a repair and rehabilitation project is paid
by state appropriated funds or by mandatory student fees assessed all
students for the project, the review and approval requirements of this
section apply only if the project exceeds two three million dollars
($2,000,000). ($3,000,000).
SECTION 13. IC 21-33-3-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. Each state educational
institution shall submit a report by April 1 of each year to the
budget committee and the commission for higher education listing
each capital project of the state educational institution for the
immediately preceding full calendar year:
(1) the cost of which is between two million dollars
($2,000,000) and three million dollars ($3,000,000); and
(2) that did not receive review by the commission for higher
SEA 204 — CC 1

11
education under this chapter.
The report shall include for each capital project the location, cost,
and funding source or sources of the capital project as well as any
additional information required by the commission for higher
education.
SECTION 14. IC 21-40-6-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.138-2025,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Not later than November 1, 2025, and each
November 1 thereafter, of each year, the commission for higher
education shall prepare a report regarding that includes the following:
(1) Student enrollment data for:
(1) (A) each state educational institution; and
(2) (B) each state educational institution's college or program
of:
(A) (i) engineering; and
(B) (ii) computer science;
if the institution offers a college or program described in this
subdivision.
(2) Information regarding the following for each state
educational institution:
(A) The percentage of students enrolled in the state
educational institution who are charged tuition based on
the resident tuition rate.
(B) The percentage of students enrolled in the state
educational institution who are charged tuition based on
the nonresident tuition rate.
A state educational institution must submit to the commission
any information needed by the commission to determine the
percentages under this subdivision.
(b) The report described in subsection (a) must include the
following student enrollment data information:
(1) The total number of students enrolled in the institution,
college, or program, not including students enrolled in a dual
credit offering or a dual enrollment course, disaggregated by the
following:
(A) The number and percentage of enrolled students who:
(i) are Indiana residents; and
(ii) are not Indiana residents.
(B) The number and percentage of enrolled students who:
(i) are United States citizens; and
(ii) are not United States citizens.
(C) The number and percentage of enrolled students described
SEA 204 — CC 1

12
under clause (B)(ii) disaggregated by the student's country of
origin.
(2) The total number of students enrolled in a dual credit offering
or a dual enrollment course from the institution, college, or
program.
(c) The commission for higher education shall:
(1) submit the report required under subsection (a) to the:
(A) legislative council in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6;
and
(B) budget committee; and
(2) publish the report on the commission's website.
SECTION 15. IC 21-41-5-15 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 15. Before November 1, 2016, and each November 1
thereafter, Ivy Tech Community College shall provide the budget
committee the following information for each of Ivy Tech Community
College's owned or operated campus locations or sites that offer
ongoing academic programs and services:
(1) The number of students enrolled.
(2) The amount of square feet of each building.
(3) The operating or overhead costs associated with the campus
location or site.
SECTION 16. IC 21-42-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.120-2013,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The core transfer library shall be developed in
accordance with the following principles:
(1) Each course in the core transfer library must transfer in and
apply toward meeting degree requirements in the same way as the
receiving state educational institution's equivalent course.
(2) Courses in the core transfer library must draw from the liberal
arts and introductory or foundational courses in technical,
professional, and occupational fields that are part of the single
articulation pathways established under IC 21-42-6-4.
(3) At least seventy (70) courses must be identified for inclusion
in the core transfer library. The identified courses must emphasize
the courses most frequently taken by undergraduates.
(4) With respect to core transfer library courses being transferred
from a state educational institution to Indiana University or
Purdue University, Indiana University and Purdue University
must identify transfer equivalents so that a course accepted by one
(1) regional campus is accepted by all other regional campuses
that offer the same transfer equivalent course.
(5) Within the Indiana University system and Purdue University
SEA 204 — CC 1

13
system, equivalent courses, including courses with the same
course number and title, must count in the same way at all
campuses within the system where the course is offered.
(6) A state educational institution shall award course credit
for a satisfactory score (as defined in IC 20-36-1-4) on an
advanced placement examination in which the advanced
placement examination corresponds to the state educational
institution's course in the core transfer library.
(7) With respect to course credit awarded by a state
educational institution for a satisfactory score (as defined in
IC 20-36-1-4) on an advanced placement examination that
corresponds to the state educational institution's course on the
core transfer library, a receiving state educational institution
must transfer and apply course credit in alignment with the
receiving state educational institution's corresponding course
in the core transfer library or as elective credit if no
corresponding course is offered in the core transfer library.
(8) A state educational institution shall award course credit
for a score described in IC 20-36-6-6(c) on a Cambridge
International Advanced A or AS Level examination in which
the Cambridge International examination corresponds to the
state educational institution's course in the core transfer
library.
(9) With respect to course credit awarded by a state
educational institution for a score described in IC 20-36-6-6(c)
on a Cambridge International Advanced A or AS Level
examination that corresponds to the state educational
institution's course on the core transfer library, a receiving
state educational institution must transfer and apply course
credit in alignment with the receiving state educational
institution's corresponding course in the core transfer library
or as elective credit if no corresponding course is offered in
the core transfer library.
SECTION 17. IC 21-44-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8. Health Profession Education Program
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a contract entered into or
renewed before July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "health profession education
program" means an education program that:
(1) is designed to prepare a student for a career in a health
SEA 204 — CC 1

14
profession regulated by an entity described in IC 25-0.5-11;
and
(2) requires a student to complete clinical training or clinical
experience at an offsite facility.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "immunization" means the
treatment of an individual with a vaccine to produce immunity.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "student" means a student
enrolled in a health profession education program.
Sec. 5. A student may not be required to receive an
immunization as a condition of:
(1) enrolling or participating in a health profession education
program; or
(2) participating in or obtaining clinical training or clinical
experience required by a health profession education
program;
if a parent of the student, if the student is an unemancipated minor,
or a student, if the student is an adult or emancipated minor,
objects based on a sincerely held religious belief.
Sec. 6. A health care provider that participates in a health
profession education program may not require a student to receive
an immunization as a condition of participating in or obtaining
clinical training or clinical experience:
(1) required by a health profession education program; and
(2) offered at the health care provider's facility;
if a parent of the student, if the student is an unemancipated minor,
or a student, if the student is an adult or emancipated minor,
objects based on a sincerely held religious belief.
SECTION 18. IC 21-49-4-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.113-2024,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. Not later than September 1, 2024, and
September 1 of each year thereafter, a state educational institution shall
submit to the state budget committee a report with the following
information for the preceding state fiscal year:
(1) The total number of state educational institution:
(A) full-time and tenured professors;
(B) adjunct instructors;
(C) other contingent faculty; and
(D) nonacademic support or administrative employees.
(2) (1) The total number of employees at the state educational
institution whose primary or secondary job duties or job titles
include diversity, equity, and inclusion.
(3) (2) The total number of state educational institution
SEA 204 — CC 1

15
adjudications or proceedings regarding violations of policies
regarding diversity, equity, and inclusion or harassment.
(4) (3) A list and description of what the state educational
institution did to ensure free speech rights of students.
(5) (4) A list and description of what the state educational
institution did to ensure intellectual freedom for professors.
(6) (5) A list and description of what the state educational
institution did to ensure intellectual and ideological diversity of
professors.
(7) (6) The institution's budget allocations for diversity, equity,
and inclusion initiatives.
SECTION 19. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) 25 IAC 5-6-3(b) is
void. The publisher of the Indiana Administrative Code and
Indiana Register shall remove this subsection from the Indiana
Administrative Code.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SEA 204 — CC 1

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 204 — CC 1